New York, session 2025-2026, A6185.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 108 of the agriculture and markets law is amended 2 by adding two new subdivisions 30 and 31 to read as follows: 3 30. "Livestock guardian dog" means any dog utilized for the purpose of 4 protecting livestock from predators. 5 31. "Herding dog" means any dog that has been trained in herding and 6 is utilized for the purpose of herding cattle, sheep, or other live- 7 stock. 8 § 2. Subdivision 2 of section 110 of the agriculture and markets law, 9 as added by section 5 of part T of chapter 59 of the laws of 2010, is 10 amended to read as follows: 11 2. Municipalities [may] shall exempt from their licensing fees any 12 guide dog, hearing dog, service dog, war dog, working search dog, 13 detection dog, police work dog [or], therapy dog, livestock guardian dog 14 or herding dog. Each copy of any license for such dogs shall be conspic- 15 uously marked "Guide Dog", "Hearing Dog", "Service Dog", "Working Search 16 Dog", "War Dog", "Detection Dog", "Police Work Dog", [or] "Therapy Dog", 17 "Livestock Guardian Dog" or "Herding Dog", as may be appropriate, by the 18 clerk or authorized dog control officer. 19 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04897-01-5